Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 9. Medical Malpractice Insurance Assistance Account

Cross references

As to the Medical Malpractice Insurance Act, see title 26, chapter 33.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 5, § 1, provides:

“(a)

The Wyoming legislature finds that:

“(i)

Physicians' medical malpractice insurance is available from a very limited number of authorized insurers in Wyoming and has been recognized to be a noncompetitive market by the Wyoming insurance commissioner;

“(ii)

That limited availability has been exacerbated by the withdrawal from the state of one (1) of the two (2) major medical malpractice insurers. That action will require some physicians to change insurers and some to acquire coverage for prior acts;

“(iii)

Medical malpractice insurance premiums generally are increasing. These premiums are even more costly if a physician is required to change insurers. The increased premiums are causing and may continue to cause physicians to limit or close their practices, or in some cases, to leave the state;

“(iv)

Wyoming has difficulty recruiting and retaining sufficient numbers of physicians to practice in various parts of the state;

“(v)

A sufficient number of physicians throughout the state is critical to the availability of adequate medical care for Wyoming citizens, particularly individuals under the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act and the Wyoming Uninsured Child Health Insurance Program, as well as to other needy individuals;

“(vi)

Ensuring the availability of adequate medical care to Wyoming citizens is a compelling interest of the state; and

“(vii)

The availability of adequate medical care to Wyoming citizens, is threatened without implementation of this act.

“(b)

The legislature determines that the assistance contemplated by this act is necessary to support the compelling state interests of ensuring the availability of adequate medical care, encouraging physicians to offer medical care in Wyoming's communities, and encouraging physicians to provide medical care to needy and poor persons. The legislature further determines that assistance contemplated by this act is both for a public purpose and for necessary support of the poor as authorized in Article 16, Section 6 of the Wyoming Constitution.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 5, § 3, as amended by Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 339, as added by Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 4, appropriates $1,500,000 from the budget reserve account to the medical malpractice insurance assistance account created by the act to implement the act, including loans for physicians' qualified medical malpractice insurance premiums, loans for risk retention group participation and administrative costs incurred by the department of health in the implementation of the act.

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 5, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 29, 2004.

§ 35-1-901.
Definitions. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess. ch. 5, § 2; repealed by 2021 ch. 149, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 35-1-902.
Medical malpractice insurance assistance account; creation; duties of the department; requirements for assistance; breach. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 5, § 2; 2006, ch. 116, § 1; repealed by 2016 ch. 37, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 35-1-903.
Assistance for risk retention group participation; duties of the department; requirements for assistance; breach. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 5, § 2; 2006, ch. 116, § 1; 2016 ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; repealed by 2021 ch. 149, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.